Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
PAWNBROKERS

Note

Sections 445-131 to 445-136 designated as Part V by L 1990, c
164, §28.

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers, see chapter 486M.

§445-131 Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Holding period" means a period of
time not less than thirty days after the maturity date, in which a customer has
the right to redeem pledged goods by paying a pawnbroker the amount provided in
the applicable pawn transaction agreement and an additional pawn finance
charge.

"Maturity date" means the date upon
which a pawn transaction agreement expires and the holding period begins to
run.

"Month" means that period of time
from one date in a calendar month to the corresponding date in the following
calendar month, but if there is no corresponding date, then the last day of the
following month, and when computations are made for a fraction of a month, a
day shall be one-thirtieth of a month.

"Pawnbroker" means a person engaged
in the business of making pawn transactions, but does not include financial
institutions whose deposits are federally insured and companies that are
regulated or supervised by the division of financial institutions.

"Pawn finance charge" means the sum
of all charges, payable directly or indirectly by the customer and imposed
directly or indirectly by the pawnbroker, including charges for insurance,
handling, storage, and any other charge imposed incidental to the pawn
transaction.

"Pawn transaction" means the act of
lending money on the security of pledged goods or the act of purchasing
tangible personal property on condition that it may be redeemed or repurchased
by the seller for a fixed price within a fixed period of time.

"Pledged goods" means tangible personal
property, other than choses in action, securities, or printed evidences of
indebtedness, that is deposited with or otherwise actually delivered into the
possession of a pawnbroker in the course of the pawnbroker's business and in
connection with a pawn transaction. [L 1886, c 28, §1; RL 1925, §2072; RL 1935,
§2492; RL 1945, §7096; RL 1955, §155-76; HRS §445-131; am L 1992, c 192, §3]

Case Notes

General rules as to the use of articles pawned stated. 1 H.
74 (1851).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next